Hawaii statutes.
[§671-6] Administration of chapter.
The director of commerce and consumer affairs shall be responsible for the
implementation and administration of this chapter and shall adopt rules, in
conformity with chapter 91, necessary for the purposes of this chapter. [L
1976, c 219, pt of §2; am L 1982, c 204, §8; am L 1983, c 124, §17]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next